New Jersey, session 222, A2537.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. As used in this act: Brand name means the proprietary or trade name assigned to a drug product by the manufacturer or distributor of the product. Carrier means an insurance company, health service corporation, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization authorized to issue health benefits plans in this State or any entity contracted to administer health benefits in connection with the State Health Benefits Program or School Employees' Health Benefits Program. Generic version means prescription drug product approved and designated by the United State Food and Drug Administration as therapeutic equivalents for reference listed drug products. Prior authorization means the process used by carriers to determine the medical necessity of a covered service. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a carrier shall not require prior authorization for prescribing an interchangeable drug if the brand name drug or generic version is not available. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.